Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-1908
Child Care Licensing Act; act, how cited; legislative findings.

(1) Sections 71-1908 to 71-1923.03 shall be known and may be cited as the Child Care Licensing Act.

(2) The Legislature finds that there is a present and growing need for quality child care programs and facilities. There is a need to establish and maintain licensure of persons providing such programs to ensure that such persons are competent and are using safe and adequate facilities. The Legislature further finds and declares that the development and supervision of programs are a matter of statewide concern and should be dealt with uniformly on the state and local levels. There is a need for cooperation among the various state and local agencies which impose standards on licensees, and there should be one agency which coordinates the enforcement of such standards and informs the Legislature about cooperation among the various agencies.

Laws 1984, LB 130, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 29;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 67;

Laws 2013, LB105, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 60;

Laws 2020, LB1185, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB874, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB457, § 2.